Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB56.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2706(d) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2706. Terroristic threats.* * *(d) Grading.--[An](1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), an offense under subsection (a) constitutes a misdemeanor of the first degree [unless the].(2) An offense under subsection (a) constitutes a felony of the third degree if:(i) the threat causes the occupants of the building, place of assembly or facility of public transportation to be diverted from their normal or customary operations[, 123456789101112131415161718 in which case the offense constitutes a felony of the third degree.]; or(ii) the threat relates to a church, synagogue or other facility or place used for religious worship or other religious purpose, school, educational facility, community center, municipal building, courthouse facility or State or local government building.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0056PN0046 - 2 - 123456789